Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 2. Quieting Title, Ejectment, Rights of Occupying Claimants

Cross references. —

As to limitations of actions concerning real estate generally, see §

1-3-102

.

As to venue of actions concerning real estate, see §§

1-5-101

and

1-5-102

.

As to lis pendens when real estate is located in other counties, see §

1-6-107

.

Law reviews. —

See “Mineral Severance in Wyoming,” 2 Wyo. L.J. 62.

For comment, “Procedural Considerations in the Judicial Determination of Water Disputes,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 513 (1974).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d Ejectment § 1 et seq.; 41 Am. Jur. 2d Improvements §§ 5 to 29; 65 Am. Jur. 2d Quieting Title and Determination of Adverse Claims § 1 et seq.

28A C.J.S. Ejectment § 1 et seq.; 42 C.J.S. Improvements §§ 4 to 9.

§ 1-32-201.
Action to quiet title.

An action may be brought
by a person in possession of real property against any person who
claims an estate or interest therein adverse to him, for the purpose
of determining the adverse estate or interest. The person bringing
the action may hold possession himself or by his tenant.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 637; R.S. 1887, § 2985; R.S. 1899, § 4104; C.S. 1910, § 4964; C.S. 1920, § 6234; R.S. 1931, § 89-3901; C.S. 1945, § 3-7001; W.S. 1957, § 1-958; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-301.

Cross references. —

As to statute of limitations for actions for recovery of real property, see §

1-3-103

.

Purpose for which action to quiet title is brought

is to determine adverse claims to real property to secure repose and put at rest in one comprehensive action all adverse and conflicting claims, to fix the status of the land with respect to ownership, and to establish by decree a muniment of title to it. Barrett v. Town of Guernsey, 652 P.2d 395,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 390

(Wyo. 1982).

Nature of action. —

Proceeding to quiet title is an action equitable in its nature and governed by rules pertaining to suits in equity, except where statute directs otherwise. Norris v. United Mineral Prods. Co., 61 Wyo. 386, 158 P.2d 679,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1945).

“Possession” means

possession of land when one is in occupation thereof, with the intention, actually realized, of excluding occupation by others, or when, although not in actual occupation, one claims the right of exclusive occupation, and no person is in occupation opposing that claim. Ohio Oil Co. v. Wyoming Agency, 63 Wyo. 187, 179 P.2d 773,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1947).

The definition of possession found in §

34-2-131

(a)(iv) (tax deeds) pertains only to §§

34-2-131

through

34-2-135

and cannot be applied to a determination of whether a party has complied with the possession requirement under this section. Goodrich v. Stobbe, 908 P.2d 416,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1995).

Ownership not essential to maintain suit. —

It was intention of legislature in enacting this section to emphasize prescriptive laws of universal recognition in the western states that ownership of title is not essential to maintenance of suit to quiet title action. Gillis v. Downey, 85 F. 483, 1898 U.S. App. LEXIS 2183 (8th Cir. 1898).

But possession required. —

In an action to quiet title to land held under alleged void tax deed, where plaintiff was not in possession, ejectment, rather than a quiet title action, was held proper remedy. Huber v. Delong, 54 Wyo. 240, 91 P.2d 53,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1939).

In consolidated civil actions involving ownership disputes among neighboring landowners, the trial court's grant of appellees'
quiet title claim was reversed because appellees did not prove that they were in possession of the disputed portion of their tract. In fact, they proved the opposite.
Bellis v. Kersey, 2010 WY 138, 241 P.3d 818,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2010).

Basis for rule requiring possession by plaintiff. —

The rule requiring actual possession by plaintiff in an action to quiet title is based on the availability of full protection through an action in ejectment or its statutory substitute. Amick v. Elwood, 77 Wyo. 269, 314 P.2d 944,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1957).

If land is not occupied by anyone,

the plaintiff having title may sue to have his title quieted, either because the remedy exists independent of the statute or because his title gives him constructive possession. Ohio Oil Co. v. Wyoming Agency, 63 Wyo. 187, 179 P.2d 773,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1947).

The plaintiff was entitled to maintain her quiet title action where, although she did not physically reside on the property, she claimed title to it by virtue of a tax deed, visited the property on a number of occasions, paid the property taxes, made efforts to obtain title insurance and financing so that she could develop the property, and discussed the development of the property with a builder/developer. Goodrich v. Stobbe, 908 P.2d 416,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1995).

Plaintiff without federal patent. —

In action by one in possession of land, claiming under certificate of purchase issued by United States land office, against another claimant under an entry, court had jurisdiction to determine the right to possession, but, no patent having been issued, it had no jurisdiction to determine title, and until patent issues the courts cannot control the disposal of the lands. Laramie Nat'l Bank v. Steinhoff, 11 Wyo. 290, 71 P. 992, 73 P. 209,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1903).

Suit by administrator. —

An administrator could sue to quiet title to irrigation ditch rights, particularly in view of former § 2-161 (now §

2-7-401

), which so provided. Bamforth v. Ihmsen, 28 Wyo. 282, 204 P. 345,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 282, 205 P. 1004,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1922).

Suit by mortgagee. —

Mortgagee not in possession is entitled to sue to cancel quitclaim deed as cloud. Chesney v. Valley Live Stock Co., 34 Wyo. 378, 244 P. 216,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1926).

Possession analogous to that of tenant. —

A town could bring an action to quiet title to a tract of land against a defendant, who claimed a lien against the property, where the town held title to the property for the benefit of a federal agency, which agency had erected buildings thereon, since the federal agency, while not exactly a tenant, occupied a position analogous thereto. Amick v. Elwood, 77 Wyo. 269, 314 P.2d 944,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1957).

Claim under void tax title dismissed. —

Where defendant was in possession and had made improvements on her tract, but she did not have legal title and claimed under a void tax title, her counterclaim to quiet her title was properly dismissed. Morad v. Brown, 549 P.2d 312,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1976).

Adverse claim need not be of any particular character.

Ohio Oil Co. v. Wyoming Agency, 63 Wyo. 187, 179 P.2d 773,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1947).

Party need not bring quiet title action after adverse title
vests. —

A party holding title by adverse possession is not barred by §

1-3-103

because he does not bring a quiet title action within 10 years after his adverse title vests. Sanders v. Lidle, 674 P.2d 1291,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1984).

Once adverse title is vested, subsequent possession need not be adverse up to time quiet title action

is filed, so long as title is not divested in the meantime. Sanders v. Lidle, 674 P.2d 1291,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1984).

Quiet title and ejectment actions distinguished. —

A quiet title action requires proof of possession, while an ejectment action requires proof that the complainant is illegally being kept from possession. Bragg v. Marion, 663 P.2d 505,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 320

(Wyo. 1983).

Petition. —

In an action brought under this section, a petition which not only alleges possession in plaintiff, but that he claims title in fee, is not demurrable because it does not more particularly describe such title. Durell v. Abbott, 6 Wyo. 265, 44 P. 647,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1896).

Partnership owned mineral interests in certain land because, inter alia, the partnership's predecessor acquired title by default judgment pursuant to a properly stated quiet title and adverse possession suit under which the predecessor was broadly granted the entire property when other potential interest owners did not respond. Clay v. Mt. Valley Mineral Ltd P'ship, 2015 WY 84, 351 P.3d 961,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2015).

Burden. —

The burden of showing a better right is met when the defendant produces evidence of record title. It is then incumbent upon the plaintiff in possession to overcome the defendants' prima facie showing. Meyer v. Ellis, 411 P.2d 338,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 1966).

Admission. —

The admission of the defendants that plaintiff was in possession of the disputed tract constituted a prima facie showing of an interest in the land that was good against any claimant that could not show a better right. Meyer v. Ellis, 411 P.2d 338,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 1966).

Property restored to record title holder where adverse claimants
without “clean hands.” —

Since holders by adverse possession failed to demonstrate the equities (“clean hands”) which entitled them to prevail in quiet title action, the district court properly treated action as a claim for ejectment and restored the disputed property to the record title holder. Harsha v. Anastos, 693 P.2d 760,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 423

(Wyo. 1985).

Partial summary jugment granted because no agreement, reasonable
reliance or misrepresention. —

Partial summary judgment was properly granted to an owner in a quiet title action because there was no oral contract between the owner and two relatives regarding the management of a ranch since, at most, it was an “agreement to agree.” Promissory estoppel did not remove the requirements of the statute of frauds because the reliance was not reasonable, and equitable estoppel did not apply either since there was no evidence of any misrepresentation. Parkhurst v. Boykin, 2004 WY 90, 94 P.3d 450,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2004).

Subject Matter Jurisdiction.—

District court had subject matter jurisdiction because an airport had no duty to comply with the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989 when it was seeking redress for the independent acts of a lessee, which was not a bank or a financial institution. Sky Harbor Air Serv. v. Cheyenne Reg'l Airport Bd., 2016 WY 17, 368 P.3d 264,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2016).

For case where plaintiffs failed to prove title or interest in property,

and, therefore, could not bring action to quiet title, see Hirsch v. McNeill, 870 P.2d 1057,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1994).

Quoted

in

Ultra Res., Inc. v. Hartman, 2010 WY 36, 226 P.3d 889,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Mar. 23, 2010).

Cited

in

Baldwin v. McDonald, 24 Wyo. 108, 156 P. 27,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1916); Denny v. Stevens, 52 Wyo. 253, 73 P.2d 308,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 48

, 113 A.L.R. 1337 (1937); Yene v. Stassinos, 730 P.2d 791,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 650

(Wyo. 1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Remedy of tenant against third person wrongfully interfering with his possession, 12 ALR2d 1192.

Maintainability, by lessee, of action to quiet title to leasehold, 51 ALR2d 1227.

Real-property/quiet-title actions against United States under Quiet
Title Act (28 USCS § 2409a),
60 ALR Fed 645.

§ 1-32-202.
Petition in actions to recover realty; sufficiency.

In an action to recover
real property it is sufficient if the plaintiff’s petition states
that he has a legal estate in and is entitled to possession of the
real property, describing the same with sufficient certainty as to
enable an officer holding an execution to identify it, and that the
defendant unlawfully keeps him out of possession. It is not necessary
to state how the plaintiff’s estate or ownership is derived.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 639; R.S. 1887, § 2987; R.S. 1899, § 4106; C.S. 1910, § 4966; C.S. 1920, § 6236; R.S. 1931, § 89-3903; C.S. 1945, § 3-7003; W.S. 1957, § 1-959; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-302.

Assignment.—

Dissolved homeowners association (HOA) equitably assigned ownership of a lot to a second HOA. Since the second HOA had legal title to the lot and was entitled to possession, summary judgment in favor of the second HOA on its claim for ejectment was affirmed. Prancing Antelope I, LLC v. Saratoga Inn Overlook Homeowners Ass'n, 2021 WY 3, 478 P.3d 1171,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2021).

Action is less technical than common-law action. —

The action for recovery of real property under this section and §

1-32-203

, is the same in substance as common-law action in ejectment without the fictions and technicalities of pleading and practice with which it was encumbered. Allen v. Houn, 30 Wyo. 186, 219 P. 573,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1923).

Ejectment and quiet title actions distinguished. —

A quiet title action requires proof of possession, while an ejectment action requires proof that the complainant is illegally being kept from possession. Bragg v. Marion, 663 P.2d 505,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 320

(Wyo. 1983).

Proper allegations. —

A petition alleging ownership of real property, a present right to its possession, and that defendant unlawfully keeps plaintiff out of possession, together with allegations as to a lease between plaintiff and defendant and breach of covenants and conditions by defendant, properly stated an action in ejectment, of which the district court has jurisdiction, and not an action in forcible entry and detainer. Allen v. Houn, 29 Wyo. 413, 213 P. 757,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 30 Wyo. 186, 219 P. 573,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1923).

Quantum of estate. —

Under this section it is not necessary to allege the quantum of the estate. Jenkins v. Jeffrey, 3 Wyo. 669, 29 P. 186,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1892).

Joinder of actions. —

An action in ejectment may be joined with one to remove cloud from the title and cancellation of instruments. Johnson v. Sellers, 53 Wyo. 403, 84 P.2d 744,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1938).

Misjoinder. —

Where a misjoinder of separate causes of action is not apparent upon the face of the petition, the defect must be raised by answer or it will be waived. Johnson v. Sellers, 53 Wyo. 403, 84 P.2d 744,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1938).

Effect of affidavits. —

In an action to quiet title to land held under an alleged void tax deed, injunction was issued without notice and on verified petition, restraining defendants from interfering with plaintiff's possession, plaintiff not being in possession, ejectment was held proper remedy. Before answer was filed trial court vacated the injunction on affidavits on motion, and in passing thereon, the judge could give defensive matters set up in the affidavits the same effect as if set up in an answer. Huber v. Delong, 54 Wyo. 240, 91 P.2d 53,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1939).

General denial. —

Under §

1-32-203

, defendant's general denial of the allegations of the petition in an action to recover possession of land is simply a denial of plaintiff's title and an admission of defendant's possession; it will not support evidence to show an equitable defense. ANDERSON v. RASMUSSEN, 5 Wyo. 44, 36 P. 820,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1894).

Plaintiff must show his title and right to possession. —

A plaintiff in order to maintain the action of ejectment must show that he has title to and is entitled to possession of the land. Tibbals v. Mica Mountain Mines, Inc., 172 F.2d 449, 1949 U.S. App. LEXIS 2729 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 337 U.S. 925, 69 S. Ct. 1169, 93 L. Ed. 1733, 1949 U.S. LEXIS 2326 (U.S. 1949), reh'g denied, 338 U.S. 839, 70 S. Ct. 34, 94 L. Ed. 513 (U.S. 1949).

Plaintiff must show right and title giving right to possession. Allen v. Houn, 30 Wyo. 186, 219 P. 573,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1923).

Plaintiffs who did not have either the legal or equitable title to mining claims could not maintain ejectment to recover possession of the mining claims. Tibbals v. Mica Mountain Mines, Inc., 172 F.2d 449, 1949 U.S. App. LEXIS 2729 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 337 U.S. 925, 69 S. Ct. 1169, 93 L. Ed. 1733, 1949 U.S. LEXIS 2326 (U.S. 1949), reh'g denied, 338 U.S. 839, 70 S. Ct. 34, 94 L. Ed. 513 (U.S. 1949).

Defendant may defeat action by showing lease. —

The tenant may defeat the action by showing that he holds under a lease which has not expired. Allen v. Houn, 30 Wyo. 186, 219 P. 573,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1923).

Or equitable title. —

The defendant may show an equitable title defeating plaintiff's right to possession. Allen v. Houn, 30 Wyo. 186, 219 P. 573,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1923).

Violation of lease. —

District court had jurisdiction in landlord's action to recover possession of property on ground that tenant had violated a condition of lease, the action under the pleadings being one for the recovery of real property, under this section and §

1-32-203

, the statutory substitute for the common law action in ejectment, and not a forcible entry and detainer action. Allen v. Houn, 30 Wyo. 186, 219 P. 573,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1923).

Common source of title. —

Where in ejectment action both parties claim title from same source for all purposes of the case it is treated as if title resided in that source, each party being estopped from denying it, and so far as respects that source the inquiry is reduced to which party, if either, has title from that source. Hecht v. Boughton, 2 Wyo. 385,

1881 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1881), writ of error dismissed, 105 U.S. 235, 26 L. Ed. 1018, 1881 U.S. LEXIS 2110 (U.S. 1882).

Where neither plaintiff nor defendant has possession. —

Where the evidence showed that neither plaintiff nor defendant was in actual possession of a mineral estate or the surface estate, it did not justify an action to recover possession under this section, the statutory substitute for common-law ejectment. Ohio Oil Co. v. Wyoming Agency, 63 Wyo. 187, 179 P.2d 773,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1947).

Adverse possession. —

Possession to be “adverse,” must be actual, open, notorious, exclusive, continuous, hostile, and under color of right. City of Rock Springs v. Sturm, 39 Wyo. 494, 273 P. 908,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1929).

The prime object in prescribing how adverse possession shall be manifested is to advise real owner that his ownership is in danger. City of Rock Springs v. Sturm, 39 Wyo. 494, 273 P. 908,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1929).

Encroachment. —

That adjoining owner's house encroached slightly on strip claimed by defendant, held not to affect exclusiveness of defendant's possession. City of Rock Springs v. Sturm, 39 Wyo. 494, 273 P. 908,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1929).

Acceptance of third mortgage. —

Acceptance by first mortgagee of a third mortgage including the amount due on the first mortgage did not, in absence of agreement to contrary, discharge the lien of the first mortgage, and the first mortgagee continued to hold first and third liens on the property. Bolln v. La Prele Live Stock Co., 27 Wyo. 335, 196 P. 748,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1921).

Burden of proof. —

Presumption is that one occupying land for prescriptive period under mistake as to boundary occupies adversely under claim of right, burden of proof being on one claiming contrary. City of Rock Springs v. Sturm, 39 Wyo. 494, 273 P. 908,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1929).

Evidence of ownership. —

Prior possession is prima facie evidence of ownership. Allen v. Houn, 30 Wyo. 186, 219 P. 573,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1923).

Question of fact. —

Doubt whether possession is adverse must be submitted to trier of facts; otherwise it may be law question on undisputed facts. City of Rock Springs v. Sturm, 39 Wyo. 494, 273 P. 908,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1929).

In consolidated civil actions involving ownership disputes among neighboring landowners, the district court's findings of fact were not clearly erroneous as they related to the denial of appellants'
adverse possession claim, as they related to the grant of appellees'
trespass and ejectment claims, or as they related to actual trespass damages awarded to appellees.
Bellis v. Kersey, 2010 WY 138, 241 P.3d 818,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2010).

Foreclosure of lien. —

In vendor's suit to foreclose his lien, court may order a sale in satisfaction of the lien, as on foreclosure of a mortgage, if deeming it the more equitable manner of granting relief under the circumstances. Baldwin v. McDonald, 24 Wyo. 108, 156 P. 27,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1916).

Foreclosure on contract. —

In a vendor's action to foreclose as mortgage the contract of sale, judgment, quieting plaintiff's title and putting him in possession, appearing to have been formed upon theory of strict foreclosure of mortgage, but failing to allow defendants any time in which to pay the amount due, was improper. Baldwin v. McDonald, 24 Wyo. 108, 156 P. 27,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1916).

In a vendor's suit to foreclose as mortgage the contract of sale, judgment quieting title in him was to be construed as based upon equitable principles, foreclosing defendants' interest in the lands and awarding possession merely as an ancillary equitable remedy. Baldwin v. McDonald, 24 Wyo. 108, 156 P. 27,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1916).

Applied

in

Harsha v. Anastos, 693 P.2d 760,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 423

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Iba v. Central Ass'n, 5 Wyo. 355, 40 P. 527,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(1895); Morad v. Brown, 549 P.2d 312,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1976); Goodrich v. Stobbe, 908 P.2d 416,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

See “Mineral Severance in Wyoming,” 2 Wyo. L.J. 62.

For comment, “Procedural Considerations in the Judicial Determination of Water Disputes,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 513 (1974).

§ 1-32-203.
Petition in action to recover realty; answer.

It is sufficient if the
defendant’s answer denies generally the title alleged in the petition
or that he withholds the possession, but if he denies the title of
the plaintiff, possession by the defendant shall be taken as admitted.
When he does not defend for the whole premises, the answer shall describe
the particular part for which defense is made.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 640; R.S. 1887, § 2988; R.S. 1899, § 4107; C.S. 1910, § 4967; C.S. 1920, § 6237; R.S. 1931, § 89-3904; C.S. 1945, § 3-7004; W.S. 1957, § 1-960; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-303.

Reply. —

No reply is required to an answer in ejectment, which denies the allegations of plaintiff's ownership and right to possession, and avers title and right in defendant. Iba v. Central Ass'n, 5 Wyo. 355, 40 P. 527,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 5 Wyo. 355, 42 P. 20,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1895).

Waiver of defect. —

Alleged defect resulting from failure to make defendant a party defendant in representative capacity is waived where point was raised neither by demurrer (now motion to dismiss) nor by answer in court below. Delfelder v. Teton Land & Inv. Co., 46 Wyo. 142, 24 P.2d 702,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 46 Wyo. 142, 26 P.2d 153,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1933).

Cited

in

Anderson v. Rasmussen, 5 Wyo. 44, 36 P. 820,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1894); Allen v. Houn, 30 Wyo. 186, 219 P. 573,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(1923).

§ 1-32-204.
Petition in action against cotenant.

If the action is by a
tenant in common against a cotenant, the plaintiff must state that
the defendant either denied the plaintiff’s right or did some act
amounting to such denial.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 641; R.S. 1887, § 2989; R.S. 1899, § 4108; C.S. 1910, § 4968; C.S. 1920, § 6238; R.S. 1931, § 89-3905; C.S. 1945, § 3-7005; W.S. 1957, § 1-961; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-304.

Cited

in

Burnham v. Coffinberry, 2003 WY 109, 76 P.3d 296,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 1-32-205.
Recovery when right terminates during action.

In an action for the
recovery of real property when the plaintiff shows a right to recover
at the time the action was commenced but his right has terminated
during the pendency of the action, the verdict and judgment must be
according to the fact and the plaintiff may recover for withholding
the property.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 642; R.S. 1887, § 2990; R.S. 1899, § 4109; C.S. 1910, § 4969; C.S. 1920, § 6239; R.S. 1931, § 89-3906; C.S. 1945, § 3-7006; W.S. 1957, § 1-962; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-305.

§ 1-32-206.
Benefit of occupying claimant law.

Parties in an action
for the recovery of real property may avail themselves of the statutes
for the relief of occupying claimants of land.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 643; R.S. 1887, § 2991; R.S. 1899, § 4110; C.S. 1910, § 4970; C.S. 1920, § 6240; R.S. 1931, § 89-3907; C.S. 1945, § 3-7007; W.S. 1957, § 1-963; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-306.

Value of improvements. —

In ejectment, a proceeding to assess value of improvements of occupying claimant, was not a separate action. Brewer v. Folsom Bros. Co., 43 Wyo. 433, 5 P.2d 283,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1931), reh'g denied, 43 Wyo. 517, 7 P.2d 224,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1932).

Occupying claimant not applying in ejectment action for value of improvements cannot maintain a separate suit for the improvements. Brewer v. Folsom Bros. Co., 43 Wyo. 433, 5 P.2d 283,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1931), reh'g denied, 43 Wyo. 517, 7 P.2d 224,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1932).

Limitations. —

Special statute of limitations governing recovery of property sold for taxes does not start to run in favor of tax sale purchaser until he has deed and takes possession. Denny v. Stevens, 52 Wyo. 253, 73 P.2d 308,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1937), reh'g denied, 52 Wyo. 253, 73 P.2d 308,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1938).

Cited

in

Morad v. Brown, 549 P.2d 312,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1976); Morad v. Whitaker, 565 P.2d 484,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 264

(Wyo. 1977).

Law reviews. —

See “The Tax Sale Purchaser's Lien,” 4 Wyo. L.J. 275.

§ 1-32-207.
Conditions under which occupying claimant to be paid for improvements.

A person in quiet possession of land or tenement who claims to own the land and who has obtained title to and is in possession of the land without fraud or collusion on his part, shall not be evicted or turned out of possession by any person who proves an adverse and better title until the occupying claimant or his heirs are fully paid the value of all lasting and valuable improvements made on the land by him or by the person under whom he holds, previous to receiving actual notice by the commencement of suit on the adverse claim under which eviction may be effected, unless the occupying claimant refuses to pay to the person proving an adverse and better title the value of the land, without improvements made thereon, upon demand of the successful claimant or his heirs as hereinafter provided:

If the occupying claimant holds a plain and connected title in law or equity, derived from the records of a public office;

If he holds the same by deed, devise, descent, contract, bond or agreement from and under a person claiming title as aforesaid, derived from the records of a public office, or by deed duly authenticated and recorded;

If he holds under sale on execution against a person claiming title as aforesaid, derived from the records of a public office, or by deed duly authenticated and recorded;

If he holds under a sale for taxes authorized by the laws of this state; or

If he holds under a sale and conveyance made by executors, administrators or guardians or by any other person in pursuance of an order of court where lands are or have been directed to be sold.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 644; R.S. 1887, § 2992; R.S. 1899, § 4111; C.S. 1910, § 4971; C.S. 1920, § 6241; R.S. 1931, § 89-3908; C.S. 1945, § 3-7008; W.S. 1957, § 1-964; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-307.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Declaratory judgment. —

Declaratory judgment action seeking to invalidate city's sale of realty, to which persons entitled to reimbursement for improvements were not made parties, could not prejudice the latters' rights. Quackenbush v. Cheyenne, 52 Wyo. 146, 70 P.2d 577,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1937).

Necessary parties. —

In action to invalidate sale of real estate by city, persons who had subsequently acquired title to part thereof and made improvements, not having been made parties, reviewing court would not make any announcement which would prejudice their rights and send case back to district court with direction to dismiss. Quackenbush v. Cheyenne, 52 Wyo. 146, 70 P.2d 577,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1937).

Proceeding to assess value. —

In ejectment, a proceeding to assess value of improvements of occupying claimant, was not a separate action. Brewer v. Folsom Bros. Co., 43 Wyo. 433, 5 P.2d 283,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1931), reh'g denied, 43 Wyo. 517, 7 P.2d 224,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1932).

Who is entitled. —

One who took and held possession of land, but not by virtue of any contract or agreement from or under a person claiming title derived from the public records or otherwise, is not entitled to the benefits of the occupying claimants' act. Brown v. Grady, 16 Wyo. 151, 92 P. 622,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1907).

In a dispute between a tax sale purchaser and a mortgagee over the validity of the purchaser’s tax deed, the purchaser’s statutory reimbursement claims were not ripe because the mortgagee (1) had not sought to evict the purchaser, and (2) was not a “person redeeming real property.”Montierth v. Deutsche Bank Nat'l Trust Co., 2018 WY 41, 415 P.3d 654,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2018).

Good faith. —

Improvements on another's land must have been made in good faith to authorize recovery of compensation in equity. Casper Nat'l Bank v. Swanson, 42 Wyo. 113, 291 P. 812,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1930).

Subrogation. —

Mortgagee of property of insane ward acquired by mortgagor wrongfully from guardian of ward was not entitled to subrogation to mortgage and lien claims paid with mortgagee's funds. Casper Nat'l Bank v. Swanson, 42 Wyo. 113, 291 P. 812,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1930).

Value of improvements. —

Occupying claimant not applying in ejectment action for value of improvements cannot maintain a separate suit for the improvements. Brewer v. Folsom Bros. Co., 43 Wyo. 433, 5 P.2d 283,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1931), reh'g denied, 43 Wyo. 517, 7 P.2d 224,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1932).

Cited

in

Van Patten v. Van Patten, 784 P.2d 218,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 241

(Wyo. 1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Compensation, upon eviction, for improvements made or placed on premises of another by mistake, 57 ALR2d 263.

Air-conditioning appliance, equipment or apparatus as fixture, 69 ALR4th 359.

§ 1-32-208.
Conditions under which occupying claimant to be paid for improvements;
tax title sufficient to protect occupant.

The title by which the successful claimant succeeds against the occupying claimant in all cases of lands sold for taxes by virtue of any law of this state shall be considered an adverse and better title, under the provisions of W.S.

1-32-207

, whether it is the title under which taxes were due and for which the land was sold, or any other title or claim.

The occupying claimant holding possession of land sold for taxes, having the deed of a collector of taxes or county treasurer therefor or a certificate of the sale from a collector of taxes or a county treasurer, or claiming under the person who holds the deed or certificate shall be considered as having sufficient title to the land to demand the value of improvements as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 645; R.S. 1887, § 2993; R.S. 1899, § 4112; C.S. 1910, § 4972; C.S. 1920, § 6242; R.S. 1931, § 89-3909; C.S. 1945, § 3-7009; W.S. 1957, § 1-965; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-308.

Cross references. —

As to tax deeds, see §§

34-2-131

to

34-2-135

.

As to sale of real estate for taxes generally, see §

39-13-108

.

In general. —

Under occupying claimant's statute, person holding possession of land sold for taxes, having deed of a collector of taxes or county treasurer therefor, or certificate of such sale from a collector of taxes, or county treasurer or claiming under a person who holds such deed or certificate has sufficient title to demand value of improvements and taxes paid, together with interest. Walther v. Steward, 54 Wyo. 160, 88 P.2d 475,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1939).

Limitations. —

Special statute of limitations governing recovery of property sold for taxes does not start to run in favor of tax sale purchaser until he has deed and takes possession. Denny v. Stevens, 52 Wyo. 253, 73 P.2d 308,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1937), reh'g denied, 52 Wyo. 253, 73 P.2d 308,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1938).

Pleadings. —

In action involving validity of a tax title, plaintiff did not claim reimbursement for taxes paid, nor improvements, and was adjudged not entitled to the property but court order gave ten days to file supplemental petition setting up such claims; it was held that it was immaterial whether petition was entitled “supplemental” or amendment to his original petition, as issues were made up and tried and neither party was injured by the designation. Walther v. Steward, 54 Wyo. 160, 88 P.2d 475,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1939).

Law reviews. —

See “The Tax Sale Purchaser's Lien,” 4 Wyo. L.J. 275.

§ 1-32-209.
Entry of claim against occupying claimant; subsequent procedure.

At the request of either
party, the court rendering judgment against the occupying claimant
shall cause a docket entry thereof to be made, and the cause shall
then proceed as do other civil actions.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 646; R.S. 1887, § 2994; R.S. 1899, § 4113; C.S. 1910, § 4973; C.S. 1920, § 6243; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 107; R.S. 1931, § 89-3910; C.S. 1945, § 3-7010; W.S. 1957, § 1-966; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-309.

Proceeding to assess value. —

In ejectment, a proceeding to assess value of improvements of occupying claimant was not a separate action. Brewer v. Folsom Bros. Co., 43 Wyo. 433, 5 P.2d 283,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1931), reh'g denied, 43 Wyo. 517, 7 P.2d 224,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1932).

Suit for cancellation. —

Mortgagee not in possession and having merely lien was entitled to maintain suit for cancellation of quitclaim deed as cloud, there being no adequate remedy at law. Chesney v. Valley Live Stock Co., 34 Wyo. 378, 244 P. 216,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1926).

Suit for improvements. —

Occupying claimant not applying in ejectment action for value of improvements cannot maintain a separate suit for the improvements. Brewer v. Folsom Bros. Co., 43 Wyo. 433, 5 P.2d 283,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1931), reh'g denied, 43 Wyo. 517, 7 P.2d 224,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1932).

§ 1-32-210.
Question of fact to be tried by jury upon request; view of premises;
findings; trial by court without jury.

An occupying claimant desiring a jury trial shall have five (5) days and the opposite party ten (10) days after the rendering of the judgment as provided in W.S.

1-32-209

to demand a jury and deposit a jury fee as in civil actions. If no jury is demanded the case shall be tried by the court.

For the trial of the question of fact a jury, if demanded, shall view the premises in question. From the view and the testimony, the jury shall find in their verdict:

The reasonable value of the permanent and valuable improvements made on the land previous to the occupying claimant’s receipt of actual notice of the adverse claim of the plaintiff;

The damages, if any, the land has sustained by waste, including the value of the timber or other valuable material removed or destroyed; and

The net annual value of the rents and profits of the land accruing after the occupying claimant received notice of claim by service of summons.

The jury shall find the value of the land at the time judgment was rendered with the improvements thereon and its value without the improvements or damages sustained by waste and return their verdict in open court.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 647; R.S. 1887, § 2995; R.S. 1899, § 4114; C.S. 1910, § 4974; C.S. 1920, § 6244; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 108; R.S. 1931, § 89-3911; C.S. 1945, § 3-7011; W.S. 1957, § 1-967; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-310.

Cross references. —

As to qualifications, selection and impanelling of jury, see §

1-11-101

et seq.

Good faith. —

In order that one may recover compensation for improvements made on another's land, even in a court of equity, the improvements must have been made upon the land in good faith. Casper Nat'l Bank v. Swanson, 42 Wyo. 113, 291 P. 812,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1930).

Where a loan company accepted a mortgage on real estate to secure funds used to discharge prior liens thereon for improvements placed on the lands by the mortgagor to whom the lands had been conveyed by a guardian of the real owner pursuant to void sale proceedings, of which said loan company was charged with notice, it will not be accorded relief in equity as a purchaser in good faith. Casper Nat'l Bank v. Swanson, 42 Wyo. 113, 291 P. 812,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1930).

§ 1-32-211.
Setting aside verdict and judgment.

The verdict of the jury
or judgment of the court are subject to the same rules for setting
aside verdicts and judgments as provided in any other civil action.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 649; R.S. 1887, § 2997; R.S. 1899, § 4116; C.S. 1910, § 4976; C.S. 1920, § 6246; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 109; R.S. 1931, § 89-3912; C.S. 1945, § 3-7012; W.S. 1957, § 1-968; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-311.

Cross references. —

As to modification or vacation of judgment generally, see §§

1-16-401

to

1-16-409

.

As to new trials and amendment of judgments, see Rule 59, W.R.C.P.

As to relief from judgment or orders, see Rule 60, W.R.C.P.

§ 1-32-212.
Judgment on report of jury in favor of plaintiff in ejectment.

If the jury reports a
sum in favor of the plaintiff in ejectment on the assessment and valuation
of the valuable improvements, the assessment of damages for waste
and the net annual value of the rents and profits, the court shall
render judgment therefor and issue execution thereon. If no such excess
be reported the plaintiff in ejectment is barred from having or maintaining
an action for mesne profits.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 650; R.S. 1887, § 2998; R.S. 1899, § 4117; C.S. 1910, § 4977; C.S. 1920, § 6247; R.S. 1931, § 89-3913; C.S. 1945, § 3-7013; W.S. 1957, § 1-969; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-33-312.